src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-I-ááhkioohsatsis_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - aahkioohsa'tsisi - ok : # -m inanimate noun, boat AEW NA1
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Sg: aahkioohsa'tsisi
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Pl: aahkioohsa'tsiistsi
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Non: aahkioohsa'tsii

     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: [ nitaahkioohsa'tsiimi, nitaahkioohsa'tsisi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: [ nitaahkioohsa'tsiimistsi, nitaahkioohsa'tsiistsi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Non: [ nitaahkioohsa'tsiimi, nitaahkioohsa'tsii ]

     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: [ nitaahkioohsa'tsiiminnaani, nitaahkioohsa'tsinnaani ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: [ nitaahkioohsa'tsiiminnaanistsi, nitaahkioohsa'tsinnaanistsi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Non: [ nitaahkioohsa'tsiiminnaani, nitaahkioohsa'tsinnaani ]

     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: [ kitaahkioohsa'tsiiminnooni, kitaahkioohsa'tsinnooni ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: [ kitaahkioohsa'tsiiminnoonistsi, kitaahkioohsa'tsinnoonistsi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Non: [ kitaahkioohsa'tsiiminnooni, kitaahkioohsa'tsinnooni ]

     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: [ kitaahkioohsa'tsiimi, kitaahkioohsa'tsisi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: [ kitaahkioohsa'tsiimistsi, kitaahkioohsa'tsiistsi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Non: [ kitaahkioohsa'tsiimi, kitaahkioohsa'tsii ]

     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: [ kitaahkioohsa'tsiimoaawayi, kitaahkioohsa'tsoaawayi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: [ kitaahkioohsa'tsiimoaawaistsi, kitaahkioohsa'tsoaawaistsi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Non: [ kitaahkioohsa'tsiimoaawai, kitaahkioohsa'tsoaawai ]

     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: [ otaahkioohsa'tsiimi, otaahkioohsa'tsisi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: [ otaahkioohsa'tsiimistsi, otaahkioohsa'tsiistsi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Non: [ otaahkioohsa'tsiimi, otaahkioohsa'tsii ]

     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: [ otaahkioohsa'tsiimoaawayi, otaahkioohsa'tsoaawayi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: [ otaahkioohsa'tsiimoaawaistsi, otaahkioohsa'tsoaawaistsi ]
     aahkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Non: [ otaahkioohsa'tsiimoaawai, otaahkioohsa'tsoaawai ]
